District of Columbia statutes.
38-927

Repealed

Education in Partnership with Technology Corporation established.

Repealed.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-170, § 2, 33 DCR 7188
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(j), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 31-2501.